Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 1

General Provisions

65-6-101. Acquisition or construction of railroads — Acquisition and disposition of stocks or bonds.

All railroad companies of this state, and any other state or states, are empowered to build, lease or let, acquire by purchase, lease, or otherwise, and operate, hold, or dispose of any railroad or railroads in any state or states, or any parts or portions of any such railroad or railroads, and the distribution thereof, as may be determined by their stockholders, and to acquire by purchase or otherwise, and hold or dispose of any bonds or shares of the capital stock of any railroad company or companies in any state or states, and to endorse and guarantee the bonds of any railroad company or companies in any state or states, whose original charter of incorporation was granted by the state; provided, that the same should be approved by a vote of the holders of a majority of all of the outstanding shares entitled to vote thereon or upon receiving two thirds (2/3) of the votes which members present or represented at such meeting are entitled to cast, at a regular or called meeting of the stockholders of the company; and provided further, that ten (10) days' notice be given in a Memphis, Knoxville, Chattanooga and Nashville daily newspaper, of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting.

Acts 1881, ch. 9, § 2; 1891, ch. 61, § 1; Shan., § 1540; Acts 1921, ch. 71, § 1; Code 1932, § 2610; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-601; Acts 1984, ch. 739, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Apportionment for excise tax purposes, § 67-4-2011.

Apportionment of capital for purposes of franchise tax, § 67-4-2111.

Assessment of property for tax purposes, title 67, ch. 5, part 13.

Grading of extension into state mines, § 41-22-104.

Leases of equipment and rolling stock may provide for conditional sales, § 65-10-111.

Levee or drainage district improvements, assessment for benefits, § 69-5-313.

Prohibition of gas storage tanks within two hundred feet of a railroad, § 68-101-105.

65-6-102. Issuance of bonds and stock.

Railroad companies existing under the laws of this state, or of this state and any other state or states, are empowered to issue bonds, and secure the payment thereof by mortgage upon their franchises and property in any state or states, or upon any part of such franchises and property, or to issue income or debenture bonds, and such guaranteed, preferred, and common stock as may be determined upon by the stockholders; provided, the same be approved by the votes of the holders of three-fourths (¾) in amount of the entire stock of the company, at a regular or called meeting of the stockholders of the company, and that ten (10) days' notice be given in a Memphis, Knoxville, and Nashville daily newspaper, of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting.

Acts 1881, ch. 9, § 1; Shan., § 1542; impl. am. Acts 1921, ch. 71, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 2611; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-602.

Cross-References. Bonds for purchase of other railroads, § 65-8-102.

Judgments for timbers, work, or damages to person or property, priority over mortgage, § 65-10-112.

Mortgage foreclosure, sale under decree, rights of purchasers, § 65-8-106.

65-6-103. Subscription for or purchase of stocks and bonds of other companies — Contracts for construction or lease.

It is lawful for any railroad company created by and existing under the laws of this state, and for any lessees of a railroad of such company, from time to time, to subscribe for or purchase the stock and bonds, or either, of any other railroad company or companies chartered by or of which the road or roads are authorized to extend into this state, when their roads shall be directly, or by means of intervening railroads, connected with each other; and to make contract with such company or companies for the construction, maintenance, repairs, or equipments, as well as lease of such other railroad or railroads, upon such terms as may be agreed upon by the companies owning the same, or by the companies and such lessees.

Acts 1869-1870 Private, ch. 49, § 4; Shan., § 1520; Code 1932, § 2595; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-603.

Cross-References. Authorization by stockholders, § 65-6-101.

Construction or leasing authorized, § 65-6-101.

65-6-104. Limitation of time removed from original franchise.

Any railroad corporation or other body heretofore granted the right or power to build and maintain a railroad in this state, for a limited number of years, and which now owns a railroad in this state, built and maintained pursuant to such grant or power, has all the rights and privileges as are conferred by any general statutes of this state upon railroad corporations, and may exercise the same without regard to and despite any limitations of years contained in any such original franchise or grant.

Acts 1929, ch. 52, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 4013; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-604.

Collateral References.

Perpetual franchise. 2 A.L.R. 1105.

Power of corporation after expiration or forfeiture of its charter. 47 A.L.R. 1288, 97 A.L.R. 477.

65-6-105. Adoption of electricity for motive power.

Any company authorized to operate a railroad by steam is empowered to adopt electricity as its motive power, whether such railroad be wholly or only partly in the state.

Acts 1903, ch. 59, § 1; Shan., § 2425a1; Code 1932, § 4010; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-605.

65-6-106. Entry upon private lands for certain purposes.

The company, by its officers and agents, may enter upon the lands of private persons for the purpose of making surveys, estimates, and location of route.

Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 6; Shan., § 2425; Code 1932, § 4009; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-606.

65-6-107. Preference in location of line.

No railroad company shall have the right, by surveying or locating its line of railroad, to defer building its line of railroad to the exclusion of other companies that may sooner and more certainly build upon such line of route, but the company which, in good faith, first actually constructs its road over such route, shall have preference in the location of the route.

Acts 1899, ch. 399, § 1; Shan., § 1880a2; Code 1932, § 3147; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-607.

65-6-108. Location of first of two lines.

If, in determining any controversy over routes, it shall appear to the court that the second company, in good faith, intends to and probably will construct its road, the first line constructed shall be located, if practicable, so as not to make it unreasonably expensive to construct the other one.

Acts 1899, ch. 399, § 1; Shan., § 1880a3; Code 1932, § 3148; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-608.

65-6-109. Right-of-way authorized.

The corporation shall have the right, in pursuance of the general law authorizing the condemnation of private property for works of internal improvement, to appropriate as an easement a right-of-way, not exceeding two hundred feet (200'), over the land of any person through which the line of the track may be located.

Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 6; Shan., § 2413; Code 1932, § 4003; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-609.

Cross-References. Ditches and drains across, location, § 69-6-117.

Taking of land for internal improvements, § 29-16-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, §§ 7, 71; 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 14.

65-6-110. Monopolizing right-of-way prohibited — Condemnation as in other cases.

No railroad company, whose railroad may be built in this state, has the right to hold, to the exclusion of other railroads to be built, by purchase or condemnation for its right-of-way, a wider strip of land than shall be necessary for its reasonable use in the transaction of its business; and any land owned, or right-of-way held, or acquired, by any such railroad company, which a jury of inquiry in condemnation proceedings shall find necessary for such reasonable use and business of the company, may be condemned for the use of other railroads thereafter to be built, in like manner as other private property.

Acts 1899, ch. 399, § 1; Shan., § 1880a1; mod. Code 1932, § 3146; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-610.

65-6-111. Joint right-of-way or joint use of track.

In case any railroad company has acquired or owns a right-of-way over which its road is not already built, through or along any narrow pass, cliff, or gorge, where it may be unreasonably expensive or impracticable to put down more than one (1) track or line of railroad, any other railroad company, in good faith, desiring to build its line of road through or along the same narrow pass, cliff, or gorge, shall have the right to condemn a joint use of the right-of-way through or along the same, and, if after any railroad to be constructed through or along the same shall already have been constructed, any other railroad so desiring to build through or along such narrow pass, gorge, or cliff shall have the right to condemn a joint use of so much of the track as may be necessary, in like manner as railroads have the right to cross each other.

Reasonable compensation shall be paid to the railroad company owning such right-of-way, or to the one whose right-of-way, or right-of-way and track, may be so condemned for such joint use with the other road, for its property and improvements and injury to its business, if any, which compensation, together with such reasonable restrictions as the jury of inquiry may prescribe at the expense of the second road for safely using such joint track, shall be fixed by the jury as in other cases of assessment of damages in the condemnation of private property.

Acts 1899, ch. 399, § 2; Shan., §§ 1880a4, 1880a5; Code 1932, §§ 3149, 3150; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-611, 65-612.

65-6-112. Existing rights-of-way unaffected.

Nothing contained in § 65-6-107, § 65-6-108, § 65-6-110, or § 65-6-111, shall be construed to affect any rights railroad companies, whose roads are already constructed and being operated, may have in respect to rights-of-way over which railroads are already being operated, it being the intention of such sections not, in any manner, to add to or take from such rights as they may have in those rights-of-way, but to apply only to roads or extensions or branch roads to be built.

Acts 1899, ch. 399, § 2; Shan., § 1880a6; Code 1932, § 3151; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-613.

65-6-113. Right-of-way at state line.

When any railroad of another state shall intersect the line of the state of Tennessee, at a point within five (5) miles of any railroad in this state, such road of other states is granted the right-of-way from such point of intersection to any point on the line of road in this state; provided, that such point of connection between the roads shall not be more than five (5) miles distant from the state line, and the same shall be subject to all laws of the state in reference to the right-of-way.

Acts 1871, ch. 55, § 1; Shan., § 1488; Code 1932, § 2570; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-614.

65-6-114. Rights of foreign companies.

Any railroad corporation created by the laws of any other state shall be empowered to extend its railroad into this state a distance not exceeding five (5) miles from the point of its entrance into this state, for the purpose of reaching a terminal point, or a general or a union depot in, or in the vicinity of, any city, town, or village in this state.

Such corporations may acquire the right-of-way for their railroads from the line of this state to their terminal points or depots in this state by purchase or by gift or by condemnation.

Such corporations shall have the power to purchase, hold, use, and enjoy all real estate necessary for the erection and maintenance of their depots, shops, yards, sidetracks, turnouts, and switches, both along the route and at their terminal points in this state; provided, that they shall first apply for and receive a charter in this state.

Acts 1887, ch. 160, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 1874-1876; Code 1932, §§ 3139-3141; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-615 — 65-617.

65-6-115. Gauge of road.

Any railroad corporation, whose line is located wholly or partly in the state, may adopt such gauge or gauges as its authorities may choose, and may alter the same at pleasure.

Acts 1885, ch. 20, § 1; Shan., § 2414; Code 1932, § 4004; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-618.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 15.

65-6-116. Change of terminus before final location.

Any railroad company may, by resolution of its board of directors, change either terminus of its line of railroad at any time before the final location of the same. This resolution shall be certified by the president and secretary of the company, under its corporate seal, and filed and registered as an amendment of its charter.

Acts 1887, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; Shan., § 2415; mod. Code 1932, § 4005; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-619.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 9.

65-6-117. Power to relocate lines.

Any railroad company owning or operating a railroad or any part thereof in this state, whether chartered under the laws of this state or under the laws of any other state or states, is empowered to relocate or change its lines or tracks, to build second main or double tracks, relocate any part or parts of its lines for the purpose of reducing or taking out curves or reducing grades, and to build embankments for the purpose of avoiding trestles upon which the railroad may be constructed, or to widen cuts when necessary for proper construction; provided, that where there is a relocation of any part of a road and any industry located upon the original road, the railroad shall keep and maintain a spur or sidetrack to such industry; and where any landowner or the heir or devisee or successor in title by conveyance or otherwise of any landowner who donated the original right of way, or who parted with the easement upon or title to the same in any other manner than by voluntary sale for a full cash consideration, shall be injured by such relocation, the railroad company shall be liable therefor; provided, that under this section and §§ 65-6-118, 65-6-123, 65-6-129 and 65-6-131, no railroad shall be authorized to change the location of its line or lines within any incorporated towns, or cities, except by consent of the governing authorities of such incorporated towns or cities.

Acts 1907, ch. 464, § 1; Shan., § 1880a9; mod. Code 1932, § 3154; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-620.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 21.

65-6-118. Acquisition of real estate for relocation of lines.

For the purposes mentioned in § 65-6-117, authority is granted to such railroad companies to acquire by purchase, and to hold such real estate as may be necessary.

Acts 1907, ch. 464, § 2; Shan., § 1880a10; mod. Code 1932, § 3155; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-621.

65-6-119. Construction and maintenance of roadbeds.

Any railroad company owning or operating a railroad or any part thereof in this state, whether chartered under the laws of this state or under the laws of any other state or states, is empowered to fill its trestles and to make all creek changes necessary for the same; to construct channels and canals contiguous to its rights of way so as to prevent the unnecessary crossing of creeks and to make such other changes in the beds of creeks as may be necessary for the proper construction and maintenance of its roadbeds; provided, that where any property owner is damaged by such change in a creek, such landowners shall be entitled to just compensation for the same.

Acts 1911, ch. 55, § 1; Shan., § 1490a1; Code 1932, § 2576; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-622.

Cross-References. Acquisition of land for purposes of this section, § 65-6-128.

Drawbridges, maintenance across navigable watercourses, § 69-1-114.

Collateral References.

Application of statutes requiring railroads to provide for drainage or flow of waters to the obstruction of watercourses. 19 A.L.R.2d 967.

Grantor of railroad right of way or his privy, right of to recover damages for interference with surface water by construction of road. 19 A.L.R. 487.

Overflow, liability for, of railroad company diverting stream into new channel. 12 A.L.R. 187.

65-6-120. Construction of railroad on county highways.

It is unlawful for any corporation or person to construct or use an ordinary railroad for the transportation of freight and passengers upon any county road or county highway of this state, without the consent of the county legislative body of the county in which the road lies. Before it is lawful for the county legislative body to give such consent, the corporation desiring to construct such railroad shall procure and file with the county legislative body the written consent of the owners of the lands abutting upon such road or highway, aggregating in such abutting length at least one-half (½) of all the lands in value, such value to be the value of the abutting lands running back from such road two hundred feet (200') upon both sides of the road to be occupied by the railroad. Any ordinary railroad constructed upon such county road or highway, without the consent of the county legislative body first lawfully obtained, shall be considered a nuisance, and liable to be treated as such, both by the public authorities and by private persons. But when the consent of the county legislative body has been first lawfully obtained, such railroad may be lawfully constructed and operated upon such road or highway under such restrictions as to the manner of construction and mode of use as the county legislative body may see fit to impose in granting the license; provided, that railroads already constructed upon any road or highway of this state under a license of the county legislative body are declared to be lawfully constructed, and this section shall not be construed as requiring a new license from the county legislative body for such construction or operation under its provisions.

Acts 1889, ch. 226, § 1; Shan., § 1879; Code 1932, § 3144; impl. am. Acts 1978 ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-631.

Cross-References. Abatement of nuisances, title 29, ch. 3.

Attorney General Opinions. A county attorney may bring an action under the statute to abate a nuisance, OAG 01-166, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 164 (11/15/01).

65-6-121. Compensation for damages from construction on county highway.

Section 65-6-120 shall not be construed so as to prevent the owners of land abutting upon such road from obtaining due compensation for damages arising from the construction of such railroad, such damages to be just compensation for all property taken, injured, or damaged by the building or operations of the railroad, such damages to be ascertained and paid before the right to appropriate the property to be occupied shall accrue, as provided by law.

Acts 1889, ch. 226, § 2; Shan., § 1880; Code 1932, § 3145; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-632.

65-6-122. Tracks not to obstruct travel on highways, streets, and alleys.

The line or track of the road shall be so constructed as not to interfere with the convenient travel of the public along the highways, county roads, streets, and alleys of cities, towns, and villages, and so as to allow vehicles conveniently and safely to pass over or under the line or track, and so as not to interrupt travel on foot or horseback, or in vehicles of any kind, in the proper use of the public road, street, or alley in the usual and proper mode for their convenience.

Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 6; Shan., § 2417; mod. Code 1932, § 4006; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-633.

Cross-References. Maintenance of highway crossings by railroads, §§ 65-11-101 — 65-11-104.

Law Reviews.

Torts — Intervening Cause — Pedestrian Injured by Motorist on Narrow Railroad Bridge, 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 629 (1960).

65-6-123. Condemnation of property to provide water for trains.

Any railroad corporation owning or operating a railroad or any part thereof in this state, whether chartered under the laws of this state or under the laws of any other state or states, is empowered to condemn property for a site for a reservoir or tank; also, the use of the water from any running stream, and also a way along which to lay pipeline or lines to convey water to its reservoir or tanks, whenever the same or any of them may be needed for the purpose of such railroad. The powers conferred in this section shall be exercised only for the erecting and maintaining of tanks and reservoirs for the purpose of operating trains. This section does not apply to springs or private ponds.

Acts 1907, ch. 254, § 1; Shan., § 1880a8; mod. Code 1932, § 3153; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-634.

65-6-124. Damage to forest growth in construction of railroads.

For all damages caused to forest growth by any person or construction company employed in the construction of any railroad to be built in this state, the person shall be primarily liable for the damage arising from such construction.

Acts 1907, ch. 397, § 13; Shan., § 2883a75b15 (p. 7226); Code 1932, § 5243; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-635.

Cross-References. Criminal penalties for fires to woodlands, §§ 39-14-303, 39-14-304.

65-6-125. Right to build branch roads.

Any railway corporation chartered under the general laws of the state, which may desire to build a branch road or branch roads from its main stem, shall have the right to do so by amendment of its charter.

Acts 1889, ch. 158, § 1; Shan., § 2426; mod. Code 1932, § 4011; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-636.

Cross-References. Acquisition of branch lines or extensions, § 65-6-130.

Extension of lines and facilities, § 65-6-127.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 9.

65-6-126. Branch lines for industrial purposes.

Any railroad company operating a railroad, or any part of same, in this state, shall have power to build or acquire lateral or branch lines of railroad, not to exceed fifteen (15) miles in length, for any one (1) of such lateral or branch roads, extending from its main stem in the state to any mine or quarry, or into any mineral section of country tributary to such main stem, or to any mill, factory, or to the bank of any navigable stream, for the purpose of developing the resources of the country without any amendment to the charter of the railroad. Such railroads shall have power to condemn private property for use in the construction and operation of such lateral or branch roads; provided, that private property shall not be taken therefor, against the owner's will, without condemnation thereof, as provided by law in other cases, and such roads shall be, as common carriers, subject to the same duties and restrictions as the main lines with which they connect.

Acts 1895, ch. 152, § 1; 1899, ch. 259, § 1; 1903, ch. 210, § 1; Shan., §§ 1489, 1872a1; mod. Code 1932, §§ 2571, 3137; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-637.

Cross-References. Acquisition of branch lines or extensions, § 65-6-130.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 17.

65-6-127. Power to build or extend lines and facilities.

Any railroad company owning or operating any railroad or any part thereof in the state, whether chartered under the laws of this state or under the laws of any other state or states, is empowered to build cut-off lines, branch lines, and other lines for the purpose of the better and more expeditious handling of the public business in the transportation of freight and passengers, and to construct, build, or extend any main line, branch line, or other line into, and to serve, other and different territory, and to build second main or double tracks, turnouts, switches, spur tracks, side-tracks, stations, depots, and terminal facilities.

Acts 1911, ch. 70, § 1; Shan., § 1489a1; Code 1932, § 2572; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-638.

Cross-References. Extension or lateral branch not exempt from taxation, § 65-6-131.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 17.

65-6-128. Acquisition of land by purchase or condemnation.

For the purposes mentioned in §§ 65-6-119 and 65-6-127, power is granted to such railroad company to acquire by purchase and to hold such real estate as may be necessary or proper, and to acquire such real estate as may be necessary or proper for such purposes, by condemnation of private property for works of internal improvement as set forth in §§ 29-16-104 — 29-16-124, 29-16-202 and 29-16-203.

Acts 1911, ch. 55, § 2; 1911, ch. 70, § 2; Shan., §§ 1489a2, 1490a2; Code 1932, §§ 2573, 2577; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-639; Acts 2014, ch. 927, § 12.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, §§ 7, 17; 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 10.

65-6-129. Powers in addition to those existing under charters.

The powers conferred by §§ 65-6-117 — 65-6-119, 65-6-127 and 65-6-128 are in addition to the powers which railroad companies have by virtue of their charters or by virtue of the general laws of the state.

Acts 1907, ch. 464, § 3; 1911, ch. 55, § 3; 1911, ch. 70, § 3; Shan., §§ 1489a3, 1490a3; 1880a11; Code 1932, §§ 2574, 2578, 3156; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-640.

65-6-130. Acquisition of branches and extensions.

All railroad companies existing under the laws of this state, or of this state and any other state or states, whose charter of incorporation is granted by this state, are empowered to acquire the line or lines of any other railroad company, either in this state or any other state or states, which may connect with and form parts or branches or extensions of the line of such company chartered by this state, or by this state and any other state or states; and are empowered to so acquire such branches or extensions by purchase, lease, or otherwise, and pay for the same by the issue of their own capital and bonds, or by guaranteeing those issued by the company whose line may be so acquired, purchased, or leased; but nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the acquisition in any way by any corporation or company of parallel or competing lines.

Acts 1891, ch. 125, § 1; Shan., § 1521; Code 1932, § 2596; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-641.

Cross-References. Amendment of charter to permit branch line construction, § 65-6-125.

Branch lines for industrial purposes, § 65-6-126.

Extension of lines and facilities, § 65-6-127.

65-6-131. Consolidation of competing or parallel lines unlawful — Liability for taxes.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to make it lawful for any railroad corporation to purchase or consolidate with any parallel or competing line of railway, whether constructed or in course of construction, or to exempt railroad companies from paying state, county, or municipal taxes upon such extensions, branches or new lines.

Acts 1889, ch. 158, § 3; 1895, ch. 152, § 2; 1899, ch. 259, § 2; 1899, ch. 399, § 2; 1907, ch. 464, § 4; 1911, ch. 55, § 4; Shan., §§ 1490, 1490a4, 1873, 1880a7, 1880a12, 2428; mod. Code 1932, §§ 2575, 2579, 3138, 3152, 3157, 4012; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-642.

65-6-132. Trees to be cut down.

Every company or person operating a railroad in this state shall cut down all trees standing on its lands which are six (6) or more inches in a diameter two feet (2') above the ground and of sufficient height to reach the roadbed if they should fall.

A failure to comply with subsection (a) will render the company liable for all damages to person or property resulting therefrom; also to a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100), to be recovered on suit brought in the name of any citizen before any tribunal having jurisdiction, half of which shall go to the treasury of the county in which such provisions may have been disregarded, and the other half to the plaintiff.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 1584, 1585; mod. Code 1932, §§ 2648, 2649; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-643, 65-644.

65-6-133. Railroad police officers.

Any company or corporation owning or operating a railroad in this state may apply to the governor to commission such number of its agents, servants or employees as the company shall designate to act as police officers for the company.

The governor, upon such application, shall appoint such persons as the company designates, or as many thereof as the governor deems proper to be such police officers, and shall give commissions to those appointed.

Before entering into the performance of police duties, every police officer so appointed shall take and subscribe an oath of office, and enter into a surety bond in the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000), payable to the state, conditioned for the faithful performance of such duties. Such oath of office and such bond, with a copy of the commission, shall be filed with the secretary of state.

Each police officer shall have and exercise throughout every county in which the company for which such officer was appointed shall do business, operate, or own property, the power to make arrests for violation of law on the property of such company, and to arrest persons, whether on or off such company's property, violating any law on such company's property, under the same conditions under which deputy sheriffs or other peace officers may by law make arrests, and shall have authority to carry weapons for the reasonable purpose of their offices. The keepers of jails in any county or municipality wherein the violation occurs for which any such arrest is made shall receive all persons arrested by such police officer to be dealt with according to law, and persons so arrested shall be received by keepers of jails on the same basis and shall have the same status as prisoners arrested by any other police officer.

Every police officer so appointed shall, when on duty, carry a badge or identification card identifying the officer as a member of the police department of such railroad company for or which such officer is appointed, and the officer shall exhibit such badge or identification card, on demand, and before making an arrest.

The compensation for such police officers shall be paid by the company for which they are respectively appointed.

When a company no longer requires the services of a police officer so appointed, it shall file a notice to that effect with the secretary of state. Thereupon, the powers of such police officer shall cease and terminate.

Any person commissioned as a police officer pursuant to this section shall, prior to such commission, receive peace officer standards and training certification.

Acts 1969, ch. 111, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., §§ 65-648 — 65-654; Acts 2009, ch. 372, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 372, § 4, provided that the act, which added §§ 38-8-104(f), 38-8-107(e), and 65-6-133(h), shall apply to any railroad police officer commissioned pursuant to § 65-6-133 on or after July 1, 2009.

Cross-References. Employment and training of police officers, title 38, ch. 8.

Public officers preventing commission of offenses, title 38, ch. 3.

65-6-134. Locomotive engineer's operator permit.

Every company, association, person or other entity which employs or permits any person to operate a railroad locomotive shall issue to such person an engineer's operator permit. Such permit shall include the engineer's name, address, description, date of birth and a certification that such person is qualified as a locomotive engineer.

Acts 1980, ch. 542, § 2; T.C.A., § 65-655.

Cross-References. Carrying license while operating railroad locomotive required, § 65-12-115.